apertium-jta.jta.lexd
################################     PATTERNS     ################################
PATTERNS
# Pronouns
## Personals
### Locative
Location(1) PronounStems[LOC,GPro] Number[GPro] Location(2) Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?
Location(1) PronounStems[LOC,FPro] Number[FPro] Location(2) Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?
#### Honorifics
Location(1) PronounStems[LOC,MH] Honorifics[MH] Number[MH] Location(2) Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?
Location(1) PronounStems[LOC,FH] Honorifics[FH] Number[FH] Location(2) Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?
Location(1) PronounStems[LOC,EHIrr] Honorifics[EHIrr] Number[EHIrr] Location(2) Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?
Location(1) PronounStems[LOC,EHIrr] Honorifics[EHIrrN] Number[EHIrr] Location(2) Cases[EHIrrN] (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?
#### Interrogative Prefixing
InterroPrefix(1) PronounStems[LOC,GPro] Number[GPro] Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) InterroPrefix(2) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[DUB]|IndefSuf)?
InterroPrefix(1) PronounStems[LOC,FPro] Number[FPro] Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) InterroPrefix(2) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[DUB]|IndefSuf)?
InterroPrefix(1) PronounStems[LOC,MH] Honorifics[MH] Number[MH] Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) InterroPrefix(2) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[DUB]|IndefSuf)?
InterroPrefix(1) PronounStems[LOC,FH] Honorifics[FH] Number[FH] Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) InterroPrefix(2) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[DUB]|IndefSuf)?
InterroPrefix(1) PronounStems[LOC,EHIrr] Honorifics[EHIrr] Number[EHIrr] Cases[P]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) InterroPrefix(2) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[DUB]|IndefSuf)?
### Non-locative
PronounStems[-LOC,Obl,GPro] Number[PS] Cases[PS]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB]|Intensifier|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
PronounStems[-LOC,Obl,GPro] Number[PL] Cases[PL]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB]|Intensifier|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
PronounStems[-LOC,NObl,GPro] Number[GPro]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB]|Intensifier|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
PronounStems[-LOC,NObl,PPro] Number[PPro]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB]|Intensifier|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
#### Honorifics
PronounStems[-LOC,Obl,PH] Honorifics[PH] Number[PH,PS] Cases[PS]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB]|Intensifier|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
PronounStems[-LOC,Obl,IH] Honorifics[IH] Number[IH,PS] Cases[PS]|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) (PostPosSuf2[PER2]|EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB]|Intensifier|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
PronounStems[-LOC,NObl,PH] Honorifics[PH] Number[PH] (EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB]|Intensifier|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
PronounStems[-LOC,NObl,IH] Honorifics[IH] Number[IH] (EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB]|Intensifier|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
## Other Types
IndefProStem ((HumanRadical[Hum] Cases[AA])|(HumanRadical[NHum] Cases[NN]))? (TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
InterProStem[NN] (Cases[NN]|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
InterProStem[AA] (Cases[AA]|TotalClitic|Conjunctive)?
# Nouns & NP
## Irregulars
Nouns[NQ] Adjectivizer|(Professionalizer Number[Pl1] Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)) QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,ANoun] Number[ANoun] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,QNoun] Number[QNoun] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,UNoun] Number[UNoun] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,TiNoun] Number[TiNoun] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,FNoun] Number[FNoun] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,D] Number[D] Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[TNoun] Number[TNoun] Cases[TN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[PNoun] Number[PNoun] Cases[TN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,ES] Number[ES] Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[VIrr,Pl1] Number[Pl1] Cases[VIrr]ComparativeSuf QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NNIrr,Pl1] Number[Pl1]|(Honorifics[Pl1] Number[H]) Cases[NNIrr]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
## REGULAR
Nouns[AA,H] Honorifics[H] Number[H] Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|((PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli) EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,EH] Honorifics[H] Number[EH] Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,Pl1] Number[Pl1] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,Pl1] Number[Pl1]|(Honorifics[Pl1] Number[H]) Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,Pl2] Number[Pl2] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,Pl2] Number[Pl2]|(Honorifics[Pl2] Number[H]) Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,Pl3] Number[Pl3] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,Pl3] Number[Pl3]|(Honorifics[Pl3] Number[H]) Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,Pl4] Number[Pl4] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,Pl4] Number[Pl4]|(Honorifics[Pl4] Number[H]) Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,Pl5] Number[Pl5] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,Pl5] Number[Pl5]|(Honorifics[Pl5] Number[H]) Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,Pl6] Number[Pl6] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,Pl6] Number[Pl6]|(Honorifics[Pl6] Number[H]) Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,Pl7] Number[Pl7] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,Pl7] Number[Pl7]|(Honorifics[Pl7] Number[H]) Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,Pl8] Number[Pl8] Cases[NN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,Pl8] Number[Pl8] Cases[AA]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,MGEN,Pl1] Number[Pl1] Cases[MGEN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,MGEN,Pl1] Number[Pl1]|(Honorifics[Pl1] Number[H]) Cases[MGEN]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[NN,MGEN,Pl2] Number[Pl2] Cases[MGEN]|ComparativeSuf|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive (PostPosSuf[NN] EmphaticCli?)? QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
Nouns[AA,MGEN,Pl2] Number[Pl2]|(Honorifics[Pl2] Number[H]) Cases[MGEN]|ComparativeSuf|(PostPosSuf[PER] EmphaticCli)|EmphaticCli|Adverbializer|TotalClitic|Conjunctive QuotativeSuf? EndwordMorph?
# Verbs
## Auxiliaries
ModalVerbAux QuotativeSuf?
ModalVerbAux[DYN] PNG[Nor] QuotativeSuf?
ModalVerbAux[INT] QuotativeSuf? InterroClitic[-DUB]?
AspectVerbAux[Class4] TenseInfix[Class4] PNG[Nor] QuotativeSuf? InterroClitic[-DUB]?
AspectVerbAux[Class7] TenseInfix[Class7] PNG[Nor] QuotativeSuf? InterroClitic[-DUB]?
## Transitives
### REGULAR
TransVerbStem[Class1a] (Participle[Class1a] (TemporalSuf[PART]|PartPNG|(AspAuxSuffix[Nor] PNG[Nor]?)|EmphaticCli|EndwordMorph|Concessive[PART])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[E] PNG[-P3EP,Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(Voice[ACT] Gerund[Class1a]|Conditionals[Class1a] (EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[Class1a] (Nominalizer[VERB] Cases[P]|EmphaticCli)|(PNG[Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(AspAuxSuffix[STAT] EmphaticSuf?)|Concessive[-PART]) QuotativeSuf?
TransVerbStem[Class1b] (Participle[Class1b] (TemporalSuf[PART]|PartPNG|(AspAuxSuffix[Nor] PNG[Nor]?)|EmphaticCli|EndwordMorph|Concessive[PART])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[E] PNG[-P3EP,Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(Voice[ACT] Gerund[Class1b]|Conditionals[Class1b] (EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[Class1b] (Nominalizer[VERB] Cases[P]|EmphaticCli)|(PNG[Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(AspAuxSuffix[STAT] EmphaticSuf?)|Concessive[-PART]) QuotativeSuf?
TransVerbStem[Class2] (Participle[Class2] (TemporalSuf[PART]|PartPNG|(AspAuxSuffix[Nor] PNG[Nor]?)|EmphaticCli|EndwordMorph|Concessive[PART])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[E] PNG[-P3EP,Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(Voice[ACT] Gerund[Class2]|Conditionals[Class2] (EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[Class2] (Nominalizer[VERB] Cases[P]|EmphaticCli)|(PNG[Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(AspAuxSuffix[STAT] EmphaticSuf?)|Concessive[-PART]) QuotativeSuf?
TransVerbStem[Class3] (Participle[Class3] (TemporalSuf[PART]|PartPNG|(AspAuxSuffix[Nor] PNG[Nor]?)|EmphaticCli|EndwordMorph|Concessive[PART])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[E] PNG[-P3EP,Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(Voice[ACT] Gerund[Class3]|Conditionals[Class3] (EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[Class3] (Nominalizer[VERB] Cases[P]|EmphaticCli)|(PNG[Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(AspAuxSuffix[STAT] EmphaticSuf?)|Concessive[-PART]) QuotativeSuf?
TransVerbStem4 (Participle[Class4] (TemporalSuf[PART]|PartPNG|(AspAuxSuffix[Nor] PNG[Nor]?)|EmphaticCli|EndwordMorph|Concessive[PART])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[E] PNG[-P3EP,Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(Voice[ACT] Gerund[Class4]|Conditionals[Class4] (EndwordMorph|InterroClitic[-DUB])?)|(Voice[ACT] TenseInfix[Class4] (Nominalizer[VERB] Cases[P]|EmphaticCli)|(PNG[Nor] InterroClitic[-DUB]?)|(AspAuxSuffix[STAT] EmphaticSuf?)|Concessive[-PART]) QuotativeSuf?
